Washington statutes.
RCW 10.40.125

Sustaining demurrer, etc.—When not final.

The judgment for the defendant on a demurrer to the indictment or information, except where it is otherwise provided, or for an objection taken at the trial to its form or substance, or for variance between the indictment or information and the proof, shall not bar another prosecution for the same offense.

[ 1891 c 28 s 61; Code 1881 s 1060; RRS s 2114. Formerly RCW 10.40.120, part.]